California, session 20252026, SB1124.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22974.6 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22974.6. (a) (1) The State Department of Public Health shall, on or before July 1, 2027, develop signage for lung cancer screening. The signage shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Eligibility criteria for lung cancer screening.(B) Information on the effectiveness of lung cancer screening.(C) The toll-free telephone number of the Kick It California tobacco cessation program (Kick It California).(D) A quick response (QR) code that links to the Kick It California page on the State Department of Public Health’s internet website.(2) The signage shall not exceed 8.5 inches by 4 inches in size.(3) The signage shall be available to order at no cost from the State Department of Public Health’s internet website.(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, a retailer shall conspicuously display the signage described in subdivision (a) at each retail location.(c) (1) A retailer who fails to display the signage as required in subdivision (b) shall be liable for a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense at a retail location.(2) Upon discovery by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration that a retailer failed to display the signage at a retail location as required in subdivision (b), the department shall issue the civil penalty imposed in paragraph (1) in accordance with the procedures applicable to the civil penalty authorized under Section 22974.5.(d) A retailer shall not be subject to Section 22974.7, 22980.3, or 22981 for a violation of subdivision (b).(e) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund created pursuant to Section 22990.SECTION 1.Section 22974.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22974.5.(a)A retailer who fails to display a license as required in Section 22972 shall, in addition to any other applicable penalty, be liable for a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500).(b)A retailer who fails to display the signage as required in subdivision (b) of Section 22980.7 shall, in addition to any other applicable penalty, be liable for a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500).SEC. 2.Section 22980.7 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22980.7.(a)The State Department of Public Health shall, on or before July 1, 2027, develop signage for lung cancer screening. The signage shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1)Eligibility criteria for lung cancer screening.(2)Information on the effectiveness of lung cancer screening.(3)The toll-free telephone number of the Kick It California tobacco cessation program (Kick It California).(4)A quick response (QR) code that links to the Kick It California page on the department’s internet website.(b)Beginning January 1, 2028, a retailer engaged in the retail sale of cigarettes or tobacco products shall prominently display the signage described in this subdivision in every retail location of the retailer.SEC. 3.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.